Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2909
Audit; expense; payment.

The expenses of the audit required in sections 19-2901 to 19-2909 shall be paid by the municipal authorities of the municipality involved from appropriate municipal funds; Provided, that if any municipality has completed its annual budget and passed its appropriation ordinance before March 30, 1959, then such expenses may be paid from the general fund of such municipality for the first annual audit made under the provisions of sections 19-2901 to 19-2909.

Laws 1959, c. 69, § 9, p. 298.